Massachusetts, session 194th, HD4949.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The General Laws, as appearing in the 2018 Official Edition, are hereby
amended by inserting after chapter 90J the following chapter:-
Section 1. Navigation Applications and Heavy Vehicle Routing.
(a) No person, firm, corporation, or operator of a digital navigation application or global
positioning system (GPS), including but not limited to mobile apps and commercial routing
software, shall propose or suggest travel routes for heavy motor vehicles that divert such vehicles
from primary or commuter roadways onto local municipal roads, where such diversion is likely
to:
(1) Increase traffic congestion beyond the road’s designed capacity;
(2) Undermine public safety by restricting or delaying access for emergency response
vehicles;
of 2

(3) Exceed the structural limitations or designated use of local infrastructure; or
(4) Negatively impact the quality of life in residential or tourism-heavy areas.
(b) The department of transportation shall develop regulations, in consultation with
municipal governments and public safety agencies, to implement this section, including
identifying priority areas for restricted routing and disseminating appropriate routing guidance to
navigation application providers.
(c) This section shall not apply to emergency vehicles, public works vehicles, or vehicles
rerouted due to road closures, accidents, or extreme weather, as determined by public safety
officials.
of 2